Rhode Island, session 2025, SB488.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 40 of the General Laws entitled "HUMAN SERVICES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 23
RHODE ISLAND MEDICAID ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION ACT
40-23-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rhode Island Medicaid Eligibility
Determination Act."
40-23-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and terms have the following
meanings:
(1) “Decision to terminate” shall mean the entire process of deciding to remove an
individual from enrollment in Medicaid or request information from an individual when the failure
to respond within a set timeframe will remove the individual from enrollment in Medicaid.
(2) “Private entity data” means any data purchased from private entities or involving wage,
address, or other eligibility-related data collected by a private entity, such as data reported by
employers to a private entity.
(3) "Public assistance reporting information system" or "PARIS" means a federal-state
partnership that facilitates the sharing of data between states to identify individuals who may be

receiving benefits in multiple states.
(4) “Public data sources” means any data collected, maintained, or controlled by a state or
federal government entity or agency, including, but not limited to, SWICA, PARIS, and other state-
administered databases.
(5) "State wage information collection agency date" or "SWICA data" means the data from
the Rhode Island department of labor and training that collects wage and employment data for
unemployment insurance purposes and provides data on individuals’ earnings.
(6) “Terminate” shall mean to make a decision to terminate.
(7) “Termination” shall mean a removal from Medicaid enrollment as a result of a decision
to terminate.
(8) “Termination decision” shall mean a decision of whether or not to terminate, including
decisions to not terminate. It shall include a decision to request information from an individual
when the failure to respond within a set timeframe will remove the individual from enrollment in
Medicaid. In such a case, the decision to remove an individual who has not responded to such a
request from enrollment in Medicaid shall not count as an additional termination decision, but a
decision of whether or not to proceed with removing the individual from enrollment in Medicaid
after they do respond in any manner shall count as an additional termination decision, even if the
response is deemed insufficient.
40-23-3. Eligibility determination based on state data only.
(a) Eligibility criteria. The eligibility for Medicaid benefits in Rhode Island shall be
determined exclusively by the use of the following state-controlled data sources:
(1) SWICA data including, but not limited to, wage, employment, and earnings
information.
(2) PARIS data, including information about applicants who may be receiving benefits
from other states.
(3) Other state-maintained databases as determined by the Rhode Island executive office
of health and human services.
(b) Prohibition on private entity data. No private entity data may be used for any part of
the Medicaid eligibility determination process, including post-eligibility verification. Any
termination where private entity data was utilized for any part of the decision to terminate shall not
be valid.
(c) Retroactive reinstatement. Any individuals terminated from Medicaid utilizing private
entity data prior to the effective date of this act shall be retroactively reinstated within ten (10) days
of the effective date of this act, unless the executive office of health and human services determines
LC000288 - Page 2 of 4

that the decision to terminate was correct using only state data sources within the ten (10) days. If
the decision to terminate is determined to be correct, terminated individuals shall have a right to
appeal the termination to the executive office of health and human services and/or the superior
court and shall receive written notice of their rights. The executive office of health and human
services shall not impose a time limit on the right of appeal.
(d) Ban on automated terminations. No termination from Medicaid shall be valid unless
the decision to terminate was made by a human being employed by the executive office of health
and human services or the department of human services. No terminations from Medicaid shall be
valid if, on the day when the decision to terminate was made, the employee making the decision to
terminate made more than fifty (50) termination decisions. No termination from Medicaid shall be
valid if the decision to terminate was made by a computer program. If the decision to terminate was
recommended by a computer program, the burden of proof shall fall on the state to demonstrate
that the employee certifying the termination made a good faith effort to independently review the
case.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000288
========
LC000288 - Page 3 of 4